Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF802.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 1518HV (2) 91 lh/ko H.F. 802 Section 1. Section 144E.2, Code 2025, is amended to read as 1 follows: 2 144E.2 Definitions. 3 As used in this chapter : 4 1. âEligible facilityâ means an institution operating under 5 a federalwide assurance for the protection of human subjects 6 pursuant to 42 U.S.C. Â§289(a) and 45 C.F.R. pt. 46, and 7 subject to the federalwide assurance laws, rules, policies, and 8 guidelines including renewals and updates. 9 1. 2. âEligible patientâ means an individual who meets all 10 of the following conditions specified under paragraph âaâ or 11 âbâ : 12 a. (1) Has a terminal illness, attested to by the patientâs 13 treating physician. 14 b. (2) Has considered and rejected or has tried and failed 15 to respond to all other treatment options approved by the 16 United States food and drug administration. 17 c. (3) Has received a recommendation from the individualâs 18 physician for an investigational drug, biological product, or 19 device. 20 d. (4) Has given written informed consent for the use of 21 the investigational drug, biological product, or device. 22 e. (5) Has documentation from the individualâs physician 23 that the individual meets the requirements of this subsection 24 paragraph âaâ . 25 b. (1) Has a life-threatening or severely debilitating 26 illness, attested to by the patientâs treating physician. 27 (2) Has exhausted all other United States food and drug 28 administration-approved treatment options by contraindication, 29 potential or previous treatment failure, or actual or potential 30 adverse reaction. 31 (3) Has received a recommendation from the individualâs 32 physician for an individualized investigational treatment, 33 based on an analysis of the patientâs genomic sequence, human 34 chromosomes, deoxyribonucleic acid, ribonucleic acid, genes, 35 -1- LSB 1518HV (2) 91 lh/ko 1/ 9 H.F. 802 gene products such as enzymes and other types of proteins, or 1 metabolites. 2 (4) Has given written informed consent for the use of the 3 individualized investigational treatment. 4 (5) Has documentation from the individualâs physician that 5 the individual meets the requirements of this paragraph âbâ . 6 3. âIndividualized investigational treatmentâ means a drug, 7 biological product, or device that is unique to, and produced 8 exclusively for use by, an individual patient, based on the 9 individual patientâs own genetic profile, and is provided in a 10 manner that is consistent with a federalwide assurance for the 11 protection of human subjects. âIndividualized investigational 12 treatmentâ includes but is not limited to individualized 13 gene therapy, antisense oligonucleotides, and individualized 14 neoantigen vaccines. 15 2. 4. âInvestigational drug, biological product, or 16 deviceâ means a drug, biological product, or device that has 17 successfully completed phase 1 of a United States food and drug 18 administration-approved clinical trial but has not yet been 19 approved for general use by the United States food and drug 20 administration and remains under investigation in a United 21 States food and drug administration-approved clinical trial. 22 3. 5. âTerminal illnessâ means a progressive disease 23 or medical or surgical condition that entails significant 24 functional impairment, that is not considered by a treating 25 physician to be reversible even with administration of 26 treatments approved by the United States food and drug 27 administration, and that, without life-sustaining procedures, 28 will result in death. 29 4. 6. âWritten informed consentâ means a written document 30 that is signed by the patient, a parent of a minor patient, or a 31 legal guardian or other legal representative of the patient and 32 attested to by the patientâs treating physician and a witness 33 and that includes , at a minimum, all of the following: 34 a. If the patient is an eligible patient as specified in 35 -2- LSB 1518HV (2) 91 lh/ko 2/ 9 H.F. 802 subsection 2, paragraph âaâ : 1 (1) An explanation of the products and treatments approved 2 by the United States food and drug administration for the 3 disease or condition from which the patient suffers. 4 b. (2) An attestation that the patient concurs with the 5 patientâs treating physician in believing that all products 6 and treatments approved by the United States food and drug 7 administration are unlikely to prolong the patientâs life. 8 c. (3) Clear identification of the specific proposed 9 investigational drug, biological product, or device that the 10 patient is seeking to use. 11 d. (4) A description of the best and worst potential 12 outcomes of using the investigational drug, biological product, 13 or device and a realistic description of the most likely 14 outcome. The description shall include the possibility that 15 new, unanticipated, different, or worse symptoms might result 16 and that death could be hastened by use of the proposed 17 investigational drug, biological product, or device. The 18 description shall be based on the treating physicianâs 19 knowledge of the proposed investigational drug, biological 20 product, or device in conjunction with an awareness of the 21 patientâs condition. 22 e. (5) A statement that the patientâs health plan or 23 third-party administrator and provider are not obligated to 24 pay for any care or treatments consequent to the use of the 25 investigational drug, biological product, or device, unless 26 they are specifically required to do so by law or contract. 27 f. (6) A statement that the patientâs eligibility for 28 hospice care may be withdrawn if the patient begins curative 29 treatment with the investigational drug, biological product, 30 or device and that hospice care may be reinstated if this 31 treatment ends and the patient meets hospice eligibility 32 requirements. 33 g. (7) A statement that the patient understands that the 34 patient is liable for all expenses consequent to the use of 35 -3- LSB 1518HV (2) 91 lh/ko 3/ 9 H.F. 802 the investigational drug, biological product, or device and 1 that this liability extends to the patientâs estate unless 2 a contract between the patient and the manufacturer of the 3 investigational drug, biological product, or device states 4 otherwise. 5 b. If the patient is an eligible patient as specified in 6 subsection 2, paragraph âbâ : 7 (1) An explanation of the currently approved products and 8 treatments for the disease or condition from which the patient 9 suffers. 10 (2) An attestation that the patient concurs with the 11 patientâs treating physician in believing that all currently 12 approved and conventionally recognized products and treatments 13 are unlikely to prolong the patientâs life. 14 (3) Clear identification of the specific proposed 15 individualized investigational treatment that the patient is 16 seeking to use. 17 (4) A description of the best and worst potential outcomes 18 of using the individualized investigational treatment 19 and a realistic description of the most likely outcome. 20 The description shall include the possibility that new, 21 unanticipated, different, or worse symptoms might result 22 and that death could be hastened by use of the proposed 23 individualized investigational treatment. The description 24 shall be based on the treating physicianâs knowledge of 25 the proposed individualized investigational treatment in 26 conjunction with an awareness of the patientâs condition. 27 (5) A statement that the patientâs health plan or 28 third-party administrator and provider are not obligated to 29 pay for any care or treatments consequent to the use of the 30 individualized investigational treatment, unless they are 31 specifically required to do so by law or contract. 32 (6) A statement that the patientâs eligibility for hospice 33 care may be withdrawn if the patient begins curative treatment 34 with the individualized investigational treatment and that 35 -4- LSB 1518HV (2) 91 lh/ko 4/ 9 H.F. 802 hospice care may be reinstated if this treatment ends and the 1 patient meets hospice eligibility requirements. 2 (7) A statement that the patient understands that the 3 patient is liable for all expenses consequent to the use of 4 the individualized investigational treatment and that this 5 liability extends to the patientâs estate, unless a contract 6 between the patient and the manufacturer of the individualized 7 investigational treatment states otherwise. 8 Sec. 2. Section 144E.3, Code 2025, is amended to read as 9 follows: 10 144E.3 Manufacturer and eligible facility rights. 11 1. A manufacturer of an investigational drug, biological 12 product, or device or a manufacturer operating within, and in 13 compliance with all requirements applicable to, an eligible 14 facility may make available , and an eligible patient , as 15 applicable under section 144E.1, subsection 2, paragraph âaâ 16 or âbâ , may request from a manufacturer of an investigational 17 drug, biological product, or device, or a manufacturer 18 operating within, and in compliance with all requirements 19 applicable to, an eligible facility, the manufacturerâs 20 investigational drug, biological product, or device , or the 21 manufacturerâs individualized investigational treatment under 22 this chapter . This chapter does not require a manufacturer 23 of an investigational drug, biological product, or device , or 24 of an individualized investigational treatment to provide or 25 otherwise make available the investigational drug, biological 26 product, or device , or the individualized investigational 27 treatment to an eligible patient. 28 2. A An eligible facility, or a manufacturer described 29 in subsection 1 , that is in compliance with all applicable 30 requirements, may do any of the following: 31 a. Provide an investigational drug, biological product, 32 or device , or an individualized investigational treatment 33 to an eligible patient , as applicable under section 144E.1, 34 subsection 2, paragraph âaâ or âbâ , without receiving 35 -5- LSB 1518HV (2) 91 lh/ko 5/ 9 H.F. 802 compensation. 1 b. Require an eligible patient , as applicable under section 2 144E.1, subsection 2, paragraph âaâ or âbâ , to pay the costs 3 of, or the costs associated with, the manufacture of the 4 investigational drug, biological product, or device , or the 5 individualized investigational treatment . 6 Sec. 3. Section 144E.4, Code 2025, is amended to read as 7 follows: 8 144E.4 Treatment coverage. 9 1. This chapter does not expand the coverage required of an 10 insurer under Title XIII, subtitle 1 . 11 2. A health plan, third-party administrator, or 12 governmental agency may , but is not required to, provide 13 coverage for the cost of an investigational drug, biological 14 product, or device, or the cost of an individualized 15 investigational treatment, the cost of services related to the 16 use of an investigational drug, biological product, or device , 17 or the cost of services related to the use of an individualized 18 investigational treatment under this chapter . 19 3. This chapter does not require any governmental agency 20 to pay costs associated with the use, care, or treatment of a 21 patient with an investigational drug, biological product, or 22 device , or an individualized investigational treatment . 23 4. This chapter does not require a hospital licensed under 24 chapter 135B or other health care facility to provide new or 25 additional services , unless approved by the hospital or other 26 health care facility . 27 Sec. 4. Section 144E.5, Code 2025, is amended to read as 28 follows: 29 144E.5 Heirs not liable for treatment debts. 30 If a patient dies while being treated by with an 31 investigational drug, biological product, or device, or 32 an individualized investigational treatment, the patientâs 33 heirs are not liable for any outstanding debt related to the 34 treatment or lack of insurance due to the treatment , unless 35 -6- LSB 1518HV (2) 91 lh/ko 6/ 9 H.F. 802 otherwise required by law . 1 Sec. 5. Section 144E.6, Code 2025, is amended to read as 2 follows: 3 144E.6 Provider recourse. 4 1. To the extent consistent with state law, the board of 5 medicine created under chapter 147 shall not revoke, fail 6 to renew, suspend, or take any action against a physicianâs 7 license based solely on the physicianâs recommendations to 8 an eligible patient regarding access to or treatment with an 9 investigational drug, biological product, or device , or an 10 individualized investigational treatment . 11 2. To the extent consistent with federal law, an entity 12 responsible for Medicare certification shall not take action 13 against a physicianâs Medicare certification based solely on 14 the physicianâs recommendation that a patient have access to 15 an investigational drug, biological product, or device , or an 16 individualized investigational treatment . 17 Sec. 6. Section 144E.7, Code 2025, is amended to read as 18 follows: 19 144E.7 State interference. 20 An official, employee, or agent of this state shall not 21 block or attempt to block an eligible patientâs access to an 22 investigational drug, biological product, or device , or to an 23 individualized investigational treatment . Counseling, advice, 24 or a recommendation consistent with medical standards of care 25 from a licensed physician is not a violation of this section . 26 Sec. 7. Section 144E.8, Code 2025, is amended to read as 27 follows: 28 144E.8 Private cause of action. 29 1. This chapter shall not create a private cause of action 30 against a manufacturer of an investigational drug, biological 31 product, or device , or an individualized investigational 32 treatment, against an eligible facility, or against any other 33 person or entity involved in the care of an eligible patient 34 using the investigational drug, biological product, or device , 35 -7- LSB 1518HV (2) 91 lh/ko 7/ 9 H.F. 802 or the individualized investigational treatment for any harm 1 done to the eligible patient resulting from the investigational 2 drug, biological product, or device, or the individualized 3 investigational treatment, if the manufacturer , eligible 4 facility, or other person or entity is complying in good faith 5 with the terms of this chapter and has exercised reasonable 6 care. 7 2. This chapter shall not affect any mandatory health care 8 coverage for participation in clinical trials under Title XIII, 9 subtitle 1 . 10